Hawaii statutes.
§88-114 Pension accumulation fund. The
pension accumulation fund shall be the fund in which shall be accumulated all
contributions made by the State and any county and all income from investments
and from which shall be paid all benefits, including the bonus authorized under
section 88-11, and other than those benefits which are specifically payable
from other funds. [L 1925, c 55, §8(3); am imp L 1927, c 251, §4; RL 1935, pt
of §7927; RL 1945, pt of §712, subs 3; RL 1955, §6-87; am L 1963, c 127, §19; HRS
§88-104; am L 1969, c 110, pt of §1; am L 1994, c 276, §7]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next